Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-2119.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2011, c. 518, §
37.2-1051; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-2120.
Relation to electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)) or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History.

2011, c. 518, §
37.2-1052; 2012, c. 614.